Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1725
Commission; meetings; public; rules of procedure; adopt.

The sheriff's office merit commission shall hold meetings regularly, at least once every three months, and shall designate the time and place thereof. It shall adopt its own rules of procedure and shall keep a record of its proceedings. All meetings and records of the commission shall be public except as otherwise provided in sections 23-1721 to 23-1736.

Laws 1969, c. 140, § 5, p. 643;

Laws 2003, LB 222, § 4.